District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

20-913

Contingent claim.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 21, 1995, D.C. Law 10-241, § 3, 42 DCR 63

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 20-913.

Editor's Notes

Application of Law 10-241: See Application of Law 10-241 and Emergency act amendment notes to § 20-905.